Louisiana, session 2026, SB224.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:56(A)(1) and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§56. Compensation of board members and executive committee members
A.(1) Members of all parish and city school boards are authorized to receive
compensation not to exceed fifty dollars per day for every meeting of the school
board. School board members shall not be paid for more than one hundred forty-four
days in any one year; provided that no member shall be compensated for more than
twelve meetings per month, or, in lieu of such per diem, the school board may elect,
by a vote of a majority of the elected members, to go on an expense allowance basis,
in which event the maximum allowance shall be eight hundred dollars per month for
each member of the school board and nine hundred dollars per month for the school
board president. Additionally, members of all parish and city school boards are
authorized to receive the same mileage allowance as provided to state elected
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-360 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 224
officials going to and from the meetings for every meeting of the school board as
well as reimbursement for travel and related expenses outside the school board's
jurisdictional boundaries on school board business. Mileage shall be charged for each
day of attendance at each session of the school board. Prior to a meeting of the
members of any school board at which the members vote on the method and amount
of compensation or mileage to be paid such members, or to make any change therein,
the school board shall advertise post on its official website the time and place where
the meeting is to be held in the official journal of the parish of the school board on
at least two separate days during the fifteen days immediately preceding such
meeting. Any increase in compensation shall be approved by a vote of two-thirds of
the total membership of the school board.
* * *
E. Any change proposed by a parish or city school board from compensation
based on per diem basis to an expense allowance basis as is authorized in Subsection
A hereof, of this Section shall be adopted only upon prior publication only after
posting on the official website of the school board of such the proposed change
in the official journal of the parish on at least two separate occasions within a period
of for fifteen days preceding the meeting.